Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.430

Packaged flour to be sold by weight.

When in package form and when packed, kept, offered, exposed for sale or sold, flour such as, but not limited to, wheat flour, whole wheat flour, graham flour, self-rising wheat flour, phosphated wheat flour, bromated flour, enriched flour, enriched self-rising flour, enriched bromated flour, corn flour, corn meal, and hominy grits must be sold by weight.

[ 2019 c 96 s 14; 1969 c 67 s 43.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.